Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1406
Branch establishment, defined.

Branch establishment means a place of business situated at a specific street address or location which is a subsidiary of a licensed funeral establishment, which contains a casket display room, a viewing area, or an area for conducting funeral services, or all of them, and where any portion of the funeral service or arrangements for the disposition of a dead human body is conducted.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 542.